Utah statutes.
53B-13a-105.   Disbursal of financial aid -- Additional resources.
(1)  The board shall allocate the money available under the program to each
Utah postsecondary institution in the same proportion as the amount of Pell
Grant money received by the institution for resident undergraduate students
during the most recently completed fiscal year that Pell Grants were given
bears to the total Pell Grant money received by all Utah postsecondary
institutions for resident undergraduate students during that same year.
(2)  The board may accept grants, gifts, bequests, and devises of real and
personal property from any source for the purpose of granting student
financial aid in addition to that funded by the state.
